Kentucky statutes. TITLE XLII Miscellaneous Practice Provisions
Criminal and Penal Actions in Circuit Courts

452.210.
Change of venue to secure fair trial.

When a criminal or penal action is pending in any Circuit Court, the judge thereof shall, upon the application of the defendant or of the state, order the trial to be held in some adjacent county to which there is no valid objection, if it appears that the defendant or the state cannot have a fair trial in the county where the prosecution is pending. If the judge is satisfied that a fair trial cannot be had in an adjacent county, he may order the trial to be had in the most convenient county in which a fair trial can be had.

History.

1109.

452.220.
Application by state or defendant, how made and determined.

If the application for change of venue is made by the state, a petition stating the reasons therefor and signed by the Commonwealth’s attorney shall be filed in court. Reasonable notice of the time when the application will be made shall be given in writing to the defendant or, if he is absent from the county, to his attorney.

If the application is made by the defendant, it shall be made by petition in writing, verified by the defendant, and by the filing of the affidavits of at least two (2) other credible persons, not kin to or of counsel for the defendant, stating that they are acquainted with the state of public opinion in the county objected to, and that they verily believe the statements of the petition for the change of venue are true. The Commonwealth’s attorney or, in his absence from the county, the county attorney shall be given reasonable notice, in writing, of the application. If objections to all the adjoining counties are made and sustained, the change shall be made to the nearest county to which there is no valid objection, preference being given to counties of the same judicial circuit.

Applications under this section shall be made and determined in open court, and the court shall hear all witnesses produced by either party and determine from the evidence whether the defendant is entitled to a change of venue.

History.

1110, 1111: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 62, § 130; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 466, effective January 2, 1978.

452.230.
Removal from county in state of lawlessness.

Whenever any Circuit Judge is satisfied from his own knowledge and from the written statement of the Commonwealth’s attorney of that judicial circuit that such a state of lawlessness exists in any county of his judicial circuit or that such a high state of excitement or feeling of prejudice exists therein against the defendant that there is apparent danger of mob violence in which loss of life or destruction of property may occur unlawfully, and that a trial in the county cannot be fairly and impartially had, or that the officers of the court may be prevented from discharging their duty or the jurors intimidated or deterred from fairly and impartially rendering a verdict in the case, he may order the action removed to some other county in which a fair trial can be had. The fiscal court of the county from which the removal is made shall pay out of the county treasury the costs of the removal.

A change of venue also may be had on motion of the defendant when the facts exist as set out in subsection (1). The motion may be made by counsel, and the presence of the defendant in court shall be deemed to be waived upon the filing of the written statement of his counsel as set forth in subsection (1) and the affidavit of the defendant, which affidavit shall state that the defendant is in danger of mob violence in the county and for that reason desires a change of venue to some other county, and that he thereby waives his presence on the hearing of the motion for a change of venue.

History.

1112: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 62, § 131.

452.240.
Not more than one change of venue allowed each party.

Not more than one (1) change of venue or application for a change of venue shall be allowed to any person or to the state in the same criminal or penal action.

History.

1118.

452.250.
Transfer of papers on change of venue.

When a criminal or penal action is removed, the circuit clerk shall immediately transmit the original papers, together with a transcript of the orders pertaining to the action, to the clerk of the court to which the removal is ordered, after first making out and retaining a copy of the original papers. The transfer shall be made by the clerk, his deputy or some discreet person for whom the clerk shall be responsible. If the defendant is the applicant, he shall, before the change of venue is ordered, pay the clerk for making the copy, and also ten cents ($0.10) a mile for necessary travel, going and returning, in making the transfer.

If one (1), or some only, of several defendants charged in the same indictment, apply for or are allowed a change of venue, the original indictment shall be retained and a certified copy sent, which shall serve in lieu of the original.

History.

1115, 1116.

452.260.
Proceedings when defendant is in custody or on bail.

If the defendant is in custody, the order for the change of venue shall be accompanied by an order for his removal by the sheriff or jailer of the county in which he is held, with such sufficient guard as the court directs, and for his delivery to the jailer of the county where the trial is to be held. If the defendant is under recognizance or bond for his appearance he shall, before the order is granted, give sufficient bail for his appearance at the proper court, or be surrendered into the custody of the proper officer.

History.

1113.

452.270.
Recognizances of witnesses — Preparation for trial.

The court shall also take recognizances of the witnesses for their appearance at the proper court, and make such order as it considers necessary to a speedy and impartial trial upon the merits of the case.

History.

1114.

452.280.
Power of court to which action removed.

The court to which the action is removed shall have the same jurisdiction to dispose of the case as the court from which it was removed. If the indictment is quashed or a nolle prosequi entered, a new indictment may be found, from time to time, by a grand jury of the county to which the action was removed, and the action may be prosecuted until finally disposed of, as if the offense had been committed in that county.

History.

1117.

452.290.
Retransfer to original county after state of lawlessness ends.

Whenever the judge of any Circuit Court in which an indictment charging the defendant with a felony is pending by change of venue under KRS

452.230

is satisfied from personal knowledge or from reliable information furnished in court by affidavit or oral testimony that a state of lawlessness sufficient to prevent officers and jurors from discharging their duties no longer exists in the county from which the action was removed, the court shall transfer the action back to the Circuit Court of the county where the indictment was found.

History.

1120.

452.300.
Who may make motion for retransfer.

A retransfer as provided in KRS

452.290

may be made upon motion of the Attorney General or of the Commonwealth’s attorney of the judicial circuit in which the indictment is pending, upon ten (10) days’ notice in writing to the defendant in the indictment unless notice is waived in open court by the defendant.

History.

1121: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 62, § 132.

452.310.
Retransfer of papers.

In the case of a retransfer under KRS

452.290

, the circuit clerk shall immediately transmit the original papers, together with a transcript of the record pertaining thereto to the clerk of the court to which the retransfer is made, after making out and retaining in his office a copy of the original papers. The retransfer of the papers shall be made by the clerk or his deputy, or by some discreet person selected by the clerk for that purpose.

History.

1124.

452.320.
Proceedings on retransfer when defendant is in custody.

If the defendant is in custody at the time the retransfer under KRS

452.290

is ordered, the court shall order his removal by the sheriff or jailer of the county, with such sufficient guards as the court directs, and his delivery to the jailer of the county to which the retransfer is made.

History.

1122; 1962, ch. 234, § 61.

452.330.
Recognizances of witnesses on retransfer — Preparation for trial.

The court ordering the retransfer under KRS

452.290

shall also take the recognizance of all witnesses for their appearance at the proper court, and make such other orders as it considers necessary to secure a speedy and impartial trial upon the merits of the case.

History.

1123.

452.340.
Cost of change of venue or retransfer — Fees. [Repealed.]

452.350.
Application of KRS 452.210 to 452.330.

KRS

452.210

to

452.330

apply to criminal or penal actions in Circuit and District Courts.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 208, § 1, effective October 1, 1942; amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 467, effective January 2, 1978; 1980, ch. 188, § 303, effective July 15, 1980.

452.360.
Change of venue from county, quarterly, justice’s or police court — How action tried. [Repealed.]